Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4430
Act, how construed.

The powers conferred by the Good Life District Economic Development Act shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law and shall be independent of and in addition to any other provisions of the law of Nebraska, including, without limitation, the Local Option Revenue Act, the Community Development Law, the Local Option Municipal Economic Development Act, and the Good Life Transformational Projects Act. The Good Life District Economic Development Act and all grants of power, authority, rights, or discretion to a city under the act shall be liberally construed, and all incidental powers necessary to carry the act into effect are hereby expressly granted to and conferred upon a city.

Insofar as the provisions of the Good Life District Economic Development Act are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law or of any city charter, if any, the provisions of the Good Life District Economic Development Act shall be controlling.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 23.

Community Development Law, see section 18-2101.

Good Life Transformational Projects Act, see section 77-4401.

Local Option Municipal Economic Development Act, see section 18-2701.

Local Option Revenue Act, see section 77-27,148.